hr-HR: Površinski premaz ili omotač: Golo (bez omota); Pjenasti omot; Omot od lateksa; Kožni omot; Gumeni omot; Silikonski omot; Omot s trakom; Omot od tekstila/tkanine; Ostalo
fr: Revêtement ou gainage de surface: Nu (sans enveloppe); Enveloppe en mousse; Enveloppe en latex; Enveloppe en cuir; Enveloppe en caoutchouc; Enveloppe en silicone; Enveloppe rubanée; Enveloppe en textile/tissu; Autre
sk-SK: Povrchový náter alebo obal: Holé (bez omotávky); Penová omotávka; Latexová omotávka; Kožená omotávka; Gumená omotávka; Silikónová omotávka; Pásková omotávka; Textilná/látková omotávka; Iné
ro-RO: Strat de acoperire sau înveliș al suprafeței: Fără acoperire; Acoperire din spumă; Acoperire din latex; Acoperire din piele; Acoperire din cauciuc; Acoperire din silicon; Acoperire cu bandă; Acoperire din material textil; Altele
ko: 표면 코팅 또는 래핑: 기본(랩 없음); 폼 랩; 라텍스 랩; 가죽 랩; 고무 랩; 실리콘 랩; 테이프 랩; 직물/패브릭 랩; 기타
lt-LT: Paviršiaus danga arba apvija: Be dangos / apvyniojimo; Putplasčio danga; Latekso danga; Odinė danga; Guminė danga; Silikoninė danga; Apvyniota juosta; Tekstilės / audinio apvyniojimas; Kita
cs: Povrchový nátěr nebo obal: Bez omotávky (holé); Pěnová omotávka; Latexová omotávka; Kožená omotávka; Gumová omotávka; Silikonová omotávka; Pásková omotávka; Textilní / látková omotávka; Jiné
tr: Yüzey kaplama veya sargı: Çıplak (sargısız); Köpük sargı; Lateks sargı; Deri sargı; Kauçuk sargı; Silikon sargı; Bantlı sargı; Tekstil/kumaş sargı; Diğer
fi: Pinnoite tai käärintä: Paljas (ei käärettä); Vaahtomuovikääre; Lateksikääre; Nahkakääre; Kumikääre; Silikonikääre; Teipattu kääre; Tekstiili-/kangaskääre; Muu
vi: Lớp phủ bề mặt hoặc lớp bọc: Để trần (không bọc); Bọc mút; Bọc latex; Bọc da; Bọc cao su; Bọc silicone; Bọc băng keo; Bọc vải dệt/vải; Khác
it: Rivestimento o avvolgimento della superficie: Nudo (senza rivestimento); Rivestimento in schiuma; Rivestimento in lattice; Rivestimento in pelle; Rivestimento in gomma; Rivestimento in silicone; Rivestimento con nastro; Rivestimento in tessuto; Altro
ja: 表面コーティング/ラッピング: むき出し (ラップなし); フォームラップ; ラテックスラップ; レザーラップ; ラバーラップ; シリコンラップ; テープラップ; テキスタイル/ファブリックラップ; その他
pt-BR: Superfície revestimento ou envoltório: Nu (sem revestimento); Revestimento de espuma; Revestimento de látex; Revestimento de couro; Revestimento de borracha; Revestimento de silicone; Revestimento com fita; Revestimento de tecido/têxtil; Outros
nl: Oppervlaktecoating of -wikkeling: Kaal (geen wikkel); Schuimwikkel; Latex wikkel; Leren wikkel; Rubberen wikkel; Siliconen wikkel; Getapete wikkel; Textiel/stoffen wikkel; Overig
hu: Felületi bevonat vagy borítás: Csupasz (nincs burkolat); Habszivacs burkolat; Latex burkolat; Bőrburkolat; Gumiburkolat; Szilikonburkolat; Szalagozott burkolat; Textil/szövet burkolat; Egyéb
en: Surface coating or wrap: Bare (no wrap); Foam wrap; Latex wrap; Leather wrap; Rubber wrap; Silicone wrap; Taped wrap; Textile/fabric wrap; Other
bg-BG: Повърхностно покритие или обвивка: Без обвивка; Обвивка от пяна; Латексова обвивка; Кожена обвивка; Гумена обвивка; Силиконова обвивка; Обвивка от лента; Текстилна/платнена обвивка; Друго
sv: Ytbeläggning eller omslag: Bar (utan omslag); Skumomslag; Latexomslag; Läderomslag; Gummiomslag; Silikonomslag; Tejpat omslag; Textil-/tygomslag; Övrigt
de: Oberflächenbeschichtung bzw. Ummantelung: Blank (keine Wicklung); Schaumstoffwicklung; Latexwicklung; Lederwicklung; Gummiwicklung; Silikonwicklung; Tape-Wicklung; Textil-/Stoffwicklung; Sonstige
th: การเคลือบผิวหรือการห่อหุ้ม: แบบเปลือย (ไม่หุ้ม); หุ้มโฟม; หุ้มยางพารา; หุ้มหนัง; หุ้มยาง; หุ้มซิลิโคน; พันเทป; หุ้มด้วยสิ่งทอ/ผ้า; อื่นๆ
da: Overfladebelægning eller -omvikling: Bar (ingen wrap); Skumwrap; Latexwrap; Læderwrap; Gummiwrap; Silikonewrap; Tapet wrap; Tekstil-/stofwrap; Andet
zh-TW: 表面塗層或包覆: 裸露 (無包覆); 泡棉包覆; 乳膠包覆; 皮革包覆; 橡膠包覆; 矽膠包覆; 膠帶包覆; 紡織/布料包覆; 其他
sl-SI: Površinski premaz ali ovoj: Golo (brez ovoja); Ovoj iz pene; Ovoj iz lateksa; Usnjen ovoj; Gumijast ovoj; Silikonski ovoj; Ovoj s trakom; Tekstilni / tkaninski ovoj; Drugo
zh-CN: 表面涂层或包覆: 裸露（无包裹）; 泡沫包裹; 乳胶包裹; 皮革包裹; 橡胶包裹; 硅胶包裹; 胶带包裹; 纺织/织物包裹; 其他
el: Επιφανειακή επίστρωση ή περιτύλιγμα: Γυμνό (χωρίς περίβλημα); Περίβλημα από αφρώδες υλικό; Περίβλημα από λατέξ; Δερμάτινο περίβλημα; Περίβλημα από καουτσούκ; Περίβλημα σιλικόνης; Περίβλημα με ταινία; Υφασμάτινο περίβλημα; Άλλο
ru: Покрытие или обмотка поверхности: Без покрытия (без обмотки); Обмотка из пены; Латексная обмотка; Кожаная обмотка; Резиновая обмотка; Силиконовая обмотка; Обмотка лентой; Текстильная/тканевая обмотка; Другое
es: Recubrimiento o envoltura de superficie: Descubierto (sin envoltura); Envoltura de espuma; Envoltura de látex; Envoltura de cuero; Envoltura de goma; Envoltura de silicona; Envoltura de cinta; Envoltura de tela o tejido; Otro
nb: Overflatebelegg eller -innpakning: Bar (uten innpakning); Skumtrekk; Latekstrekk; Skinntrekk; Gummitrekk; Silikontrekk; Teipet trekk; Tekstil-/stofftrekk; Annet
pl: Powłoka lub wykończenie powierzchni: Bez powłoki (bez owijki); Owijka piankowa; Owijka lateksowa; Owijka skórzana; Owijka gumowa; Owijka silikonowa; Owijka z taśmy; Owijka tekstylna/materiałowa; Inne
pt-PT: Revestimento ou cobertura da superfície: Puro (sem fita); Fita de espuma; Fita de látex; Fita de pele; Fita de borracha; Fita de silicone; Fita adesiva; Fita de tecido; Outro